src/morphology/affixes/nouns.lexc
LEXICON kv_flt1
 +N+Fem: F_PLNA_UR ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLGEN   ;

LEXICON kv2/6
  kv2 ;
  kv6 ;

LEXICON kv2/27
  kv2  ;
  kv27 ;

LEXICON kv2/3
  kv2 ;
  kv3 ;

LEXICON kv2e/h3e
  kv2e ;
  h3e ;
  
LEXICON kv2e/17e
  kv2e  ;
  kv17e ;

LEXICON kv2 ! bygd
  kv2e    ;
  kv_flt2 ;

LEXICON kv_bd2e
  kv2e ;

LEXICON kv2e
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt2
 +N+Fem: F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLGEN   ;

LEXICON kv3/2
  kv3 ;
  kv2 ;

LEXICON kv3/5
  kv3 ;
  kv5 ;

LEXICON kv3/7
  kv3 ;
  kv7 ;

LEXICON kv3 ! søgn
  kv3e    ;
  kv_flt3 ;

LEXICON kv3e
 +N+Fem:      S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt3
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:      F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLGEN   ;


LEXICON kv4 ! fonn
  kv4e    ;
  kv_flt4 ;

LEXICON kv4e
 +N+Fem:     S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:^OA S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt4
 +N+Fem:^OA F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem:     F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^OA F_PLGEN   ;

LEXICON kv5 ! øld
  kv5e    ;
  kv_flt5 ;

LEXICON kv5e
 +N+Fem:      S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt5
 +N+Fem:      F_PLNA_IR ;
 +N+Fem:      F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLGEN   ;

LEXICON kv6/2
  kv6 ;
  kv2 ;

LEXICON kv6/h16
 kv6 ;
 h16 ;
 

LEXICON kv6 ! ár
  kv6e    ;
  kv_flt6 ;
  
LEXICON kv6e/h16e
 kv6e ;
 h16e ;
 
LEXICON kv6e
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt6
 +N+Fem: F_PLNA_AR ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLGEN   ;

 
LEXICON kv_OY
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:      FemObl_Flag ; !oy, oyggin
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:ggin  FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:      FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:nna   FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:      FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>nni FemObl_Flag ; ! oynni
       +N+Fem+Sg+Acc:      R           ; ! stem compound
              +N+Fem:      S_F_SGGEN   ;
                           kv_flt6     ;
 
LEXICON kv_OYGGJ
       +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:oyggj   DF_N_SGf_S  ; !oyggj, oyggin
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:oyggj   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:oynna   FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:oyggj   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:%>oynni FemObl_Flag ; ! oynni
              +N+Fem:oyggj   S_F_SGGEN   ;
                    :oyggj   kv_flt6     ;
       +N+Fem+Sg+Gen:oyggjar R           ; ! stem compound
       +N+Fem+Pl+Gen:oyggja  R           ; ! stem compound


LEXICON kv7/3
  kv7 ;
  kv3 ;

LEXICON kv7 ! vørr
  kv7e    ;
  kv_flt7 ;

LEXICON kv7e
 +N+Fem:      S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt7
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLNA_AR ;
 +N+Fem:      F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:^OEA F_PLGEN   ;

LEXICON kv8 ! egg
  kv8e    ;
  kv_flt8 ;

LEXICON kv8e
 +N+Fem:^JDEL S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:       S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt8
 +N+Fem: F_PLNA_AR ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem: F_PLGEN   ;

LEXICON kv9/2
  kv9 ;
  kv2 ;

LEXICON kv9 ! strond
  kv9e    ;
  kv_flt9 ;

LEXICON kv9_1 ! stong
  kv9e      ;
  kv_flt9_1 ;

LEXICON kv9e
 +N+Fem:     S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:^OA S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt9
 +N+Fem:^eIUML  F_PLNA_UR ;
 +N+Fem:        F_PLDAT   ; ! strondum
 +N+Fem:^OA     F_PLGEN   ;

LEXICON kv_flt9_1
 +N+Fem:^eIUML  F_PLNA_UR ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:^eIUMLrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:^eIUMLrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem:        F_PLDAT   ; ! stongum
 +N+Fem:^eIUMLr F_PLDAT   ; ! stengrum, stengrunum
 +N+Fem:^OA     F_PLGEN   ;

LEXICON kv10 ! dorg
 +N+Fem:        S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:        S_F_SGGEN ;
 +N+Fem:^eIUML  F_PLNA_UR ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:^eIUMLrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:^eIUMLrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem:        F_PLDAT   ; ! dorgum
 +N+Fem:^eIUMLr F_PLDAT   ; ! dergrum, dergrunum
 +N+Fem:        F_PLGEN   ;
 
LEXICON kv11 ! song
  kv11e    ;
  kv_flt11 ;

LEXICON kv11e
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:song DF_N_SGf_S ; ! song, songin
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:seingin FemObl_Flag ; ! seingin
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc:song DF_A_SGf_S ; ! song, songina
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:seingina FemObl_Flag ; ! seingina
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat:song DF_D_SGf_S ; ! song, songini
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:seingini FemObl_Flag ; ! seingini
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen:songar DF_G_SGf_S ; ! songar, songarinnar
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen:seingjar DF_G_SGf_S ; ! seingjar, seingjarinnar


LEXICON kv_flt11
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom:songir     DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom:seingir    DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom:sengur     DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:sengrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:sengrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc:songir     DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc:seingir    DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc:sengur     DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:seingju    DF_D_PL ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:songju     DF_D_PL ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:sengru     DF_D_PL ; ! sengrum, sengrunum
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen:seingja    DF_G_PL ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen:songja    DF_G_PL ;


LEXICON kv12 ! glóð
  kv12e    ;
  kv_flt12 ;

LEXICON kv12_1 ! bók
  kv12e    ;
  kv_flt12_1 ;

LEXICON kv12e
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem: S_F_SGGEN ;

!LEXICON kv12f
!  kv_flt12 ;

LEXICON kv_flt12
 +N+Fem:^IUML F_PLNA_UR ;
 +N+Fem:       F_PLDAT   ; ! glóðum
 +N+Fem:       F_PLGEN   ;

LEXICON kv_flt12_1
 +N+Fem:^IUML F_PLNA_UR ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:^IUMLrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:^IUMLrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem:       F_PLDAT   ; ! bókum
 +N+Fem:^IUMLr F_PLDAT   ; ! bøkrum, bøkrunum
 +N+Fem:       F_PLGEN   ;


LEXICON kv13 ! mørk
  kv13e    ;
  kv_flt13 ;

LEXICON kv13e
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:mørk DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc:mørk DF_A_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat:mørk DF_D_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen:markar DF_G_SGf_S ;

LEXICON kv_flt13 ! Alternative way
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom:merkur DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:merkrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:merkrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc:merkur DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:mørku DF_D_PL ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:merkru DF_D_PL ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen:marka DF_G_PL ;
 

LEXICON kv14 ! nátt
  kv14e    ;
  kv_flt14 ;

LEXICON kv14e
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:nátt DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc:nátt DF_A_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat:nátt DF_D_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen:náttar DF_G_SGf_S ;


LEXICON kv_flt14
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom:nætur DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom+Def:nætrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc+Def:nætrinar FemObl_Flag ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc:nætur DF_NA_PLf ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:náttu DF_D_PL ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:nætru DF_D_PL ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen:nátta DF_G_PL ;


LEXICON kv15 ! tonn
  kv15e    ;
  kv_flt15 ;

LEXICON kv15e
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom:tonn DF_N_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc:tonn DF_A_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat:tonn DF_D_SGf_S ;
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen:tannar DF_G_SGf_S ;


LEXICON kv_flt15
 +N+Fem+Pl+Nom:tenn DF_NA_PLf_inar ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Acc:tenn DF_NA_PLf_inar ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat:tonnu DF_D_PL ;
 +N+Fem+Pl+Gen:tanna DF_G_PL ;


LEXICON kv16 ! mús, lús
 +N+Fem:       S_F_SGNAD   ;
 +N+Fem:       S_F_SGGEN   ;
 +N+Fem:^IUML F_PLNA_NULL ;
 +N+Fem:       F_PLDAT     ; ! músunum
 +N+Fem+Pl+Dat+Def:^IUMLnum  ENDLEX ; ! mýsnum
 +N+Fem:       F_PLGEN     ;

LEXICON kv17 ! mastur
  kv17e    ;
  kv_flt17 ;

LEXICON kv17e
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:ur   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:urin FemObl_Flag ; ! masturin
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ur   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:rina FemObl_Flag ; ! mastrina
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ur   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:rini FemObl_Flag ; ! mastrini
              +N+Fem:r    S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt17
 +N+Fem:r F_PLNA_AR ;
 +N+Fem:r F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:r F_PLGEN   ;

LEXICON kv18/17
  kv18 ;
  kv17 ;

LEXICON kv18 ! brúður
 +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Indef:ur   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Nom+Def:urin FemObl_Flag ; ! brúðurin
 +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Indef:ur   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Acc+Def:rina FemObl_Flag ; ! brúðrina
 +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Indef:ur   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Dat+Def:rini FemObl_Flag ; ! brúðrini
 +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Indef:ar   FemObl_Flag ;
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:arinnar FemObl_Flag ; ! brúðarinnar
   +N+Fem+Sg+Gen+Def:rarinnar FemObl_Flag ; ! brúðrarinnar
 +N+Fem:r       F_PLNA_AR ;
 +N+Fem:r       F_PLDAT   ;
 +N+Fem:r       F_PLGEN   ;


LEXICON kv19 ! fjøður
  kv19e    ;
  kv_flt19 ;

LEXICON kv19e
 +N+Fem:      S_F_SGNAD ;
 +N+Fem:^EPH^OEA S_F_SGGEN ;

LEXICON kv_flt19f
  kv_flt19f ;
