src/morphology/stems/nouns.lexc
LEXICON Shortnouns 
men+CmpNP/None:men kv2/6 ;
rók+CmpNP/None:rók kv12 ;
rót+CmpNP/None:rót kv12 ;
LEXICON Nouns
runddorg:rund#dorg kv10 ;
sleingidorg:sleingi#dorg kv10 ;
lokkudorg:lokku#dorg kv10 ;
barnasong:barna# kv11 ;
dragusong:dragu# kv11 ;
ferðaútreiðslur:ferðaútreiðsl kv_flt1 ;
spanderibuksur:spanderibuks kv_flt1 ;
sjóbuksur:sjóbuks kv_flt1 ;
talugávur:talugáv kv_flt1 ;
djúprødd:djúprødd kv3/2 ;
breiðingarkvísl:breiðingarkvísl kv6/2 ;
verkgrein:verk#grein kv6/2 ;
vinnugrein:vinnu#grein kv6/2 ;
bergtrom:berg#trom kv9/2 ;
undirtrom:undir#trom kv9/2 ;
bryggjutrom:bryggju#trom kv9/2 ;
undirbrøkur:undirbrók kv_flt12_1 ;
yvirbrøkur:yvirbrók kv_flt12_1 ;
roðbrøkur:roðbrók kv_flt12_1 ;
telefonbók:tele#fon#bók kv12_1 ;
lunnbót:lunn#bót kv12_1 ;
orðrót:orð#rót kv12_1 ;
pípuglóð:pípu#glóð kv12 ;
fíggjarvánir:fíggjarván kv_flt2 ;
páskir+Err/Orth:páskar kv_flt2 ;
hvølpalótir:hvølpalót kv_flt2 ;
sipan:sipan kv2 ;
útiítrótt:útiítrótt kv2 ;
kø:kø kv2 ;
hálvøld:hálv#øld kv5 ;
fleyggj:fleyggj kv6e/h16e ;
lundafleyggj:lunda#fleyggj kv6e/h16e ;
groyggj:groyggj kv6/h16 ;
hjúnasong:hjúna# kv11 ;
gágguskel:gággu#skelj kv8 ;
kirkjugarðshvonn:kirkjugarðshvonn kv4 ;
kaffikvørn:kaffikvørn kv2/3 ;
kjøtkvørn:kjøtkvørn kv2/3 ;
hurðarrás:hurðarrás kv2/27 ;
grunnlús:grunnlús kv16 ;
heimamús:heimamús kv16 ;
kamarmoy:kamar#moy kv_OY ;
vevmoy:vev#moy kv_OY ;
hugmóð:hugmóð kv2e/h3e ;
hellurøð:hellurøð kv3/5 ;
piparkvørn:piparkvørn kv2/3 ;
øksl:øksl kv7/3 ;
vegøksl:vegøksl kv7/3 ;
blaðøksl:blaðøksl kv7/3 ;
mørk: kv13 ;
seyðamørk:seyða# kv13 ;
uttangarðsmørk:uttan#garðs# kv13 ;
høll:høll kv3 ;
framsøgn:fram#søgn kv3 ;
uttanbíggjarjørð:uttanbíggjarjørð kv3 ;
veturnætur:vetur# kv_flt14 ;
fríggjanátt:fríggja# kv14 ;
eystannátt:eystan# kv14 ;
óveðursnátt:ó#veðurs# kv14 ;
skarafonn:skarafonn kv4 ;
bakkahvonn:bakkahvonn kv4 ;
fjallarøð:fjallarøð kv3/5 ;
brúgvarrøð:brúgvarrøð kv3/5 ;
leysatenn:leysa# kv_flt15 ;
smettutenn:smettu# kv_flt15 ;
vaksnamannatonn:vaksna#manna# kv15 ;
máltonn:mál# kv15 ;
handilstonn:handils# kv15 ;
røðir:røðir kv_flt5 ;
útvarpsrødd:útvarpsrødd kv5 ;
fiskaørn:fiskaørn kv5 ;
veirlús:veirlús kv16 ;
uppstígingar:uppstíging kv_flt6 ;
virkingar:virking kv_flt6 ;
bogageilar:bogageil kv_flt6 ;
emaljumáling:emaljumáling kv6 ;
revsing:revsing kv6 ;
ungmoyggj:ung#m kv_OYGGJ ;
fylgismoyggj:fylgis#m kv_OYGGJ ;
flotoyggj:flot# kv_OYGGJ ;
burðarreim:burðarreim kv6 ;
festarmoy:festar#moy kv_OY ;
drýlafjøl:drýlafjøl kv3/7 ;
vaskifjøl:vaskifjøl kv3/7 ;
dygdarfjøl:dygdarfjøl kv3/7 ;
fjallabrúður:fjalla#brúð kv18/17 ;
sólbrúður:sól#brúð kv18/17 ;
yndisbrúður:yndis#brúð kv18/17 ;
skitjugimbur:skitjugimb kv17 ;
askarmastur:askarmast kv17 ;
sveitalivur:sveitaliv kv17 ;
lomvigarás:lomvigarás kv2/27 ;
spreingirás:spreingirás kv2/27 ;
sniðrás:sniðrás kv2/27 ;
bláragarnar:bláragarn kv_flt7 ;
blágarnar:blágarn kv_flt7 ;
siffanagarnar:siffanagarn kv_flt7 ;
gron:gron kv7 ;
blindgørn:blindgørn kv7 ;
vørr:vørr kv7 ;
æður:æður kv18 ;
lusiabrúður:lusia#brúð kv18 ;
bergsegg:bergs#eggj kv8 ;
útfit:út#fitj kv8 ;
strussafjøður:strussafjøður kv19 ;
velfjøður:velfjøður kv19 ;
dunnufjøður:dunnufjøður kv19 ;
fastarond:fasta#rond kv9_1 ;
vond:vond kv9 ;
liljuvond:lilju#vond kv9 ;
fuglastong:fugla#stong kv9_1 ;
lyklahonk:lykla#honk kv9_1 ;
snælduont:snældu#ont kv9 ;
deyðasong:deyða# kv11e ;
sóttarsong:sóttar# kv11e ;
barsilssong:barsils# kv11e ;
bibliografi:biblio#grafi kv2 ;
sálarbót:sálar#bót kv12e ;
matarbót:matar#bót kv12e ;
trúbót:trú#bót kv12e ;
allahalgan:allahalgan kv_bd2e ;
alhalgan:alhalgan kv_bd2e ;
blálund:blálund kv2e ;
staran:staran kv2e ;
virkistrá:virkis#trá kv2e ;
vetrarmjøll:vetrarmjøll kv3e ;
málsvørn:málsvørn kv3e ;
umboðsjørð:umboðsjørð kv3e ;
midnátt:mid# kv14e ;
miðnátt:mið# kv14e ;
arbeiðsond:arbeiðsond kv4e ;
borðskomm:borðskomm kv4e ;
tíðartonn:tíðar# kv15e ;
miðaløld:miðaløld kv5e ;
steinøld:steinøld kv5e ;
miðøld:miðøld kv5e ;
pípuroyking:pípuroyking kv6e ;
menning:menning kv6e ;
útbýting:útbýting kv6e ;
reið:reið kv2e/17e ;
brimreið:brimreið kv2e/17e ;
nævur:næv kv17e ;
morgungron:morgungron kv7e ;
neyðsyn:neyð#synj kv8e ;
fjáltur:fjáltur kv19e ;
ravatenn:rava# kv_flt15 ;
